Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201261-221
State Treasurer; 2013 transfer to
Water Resources Cash Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer $600,000 from the General
Fund to the Water Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2013, on such
date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services, pursuant to section 61-218.

Laws 2011, LB229, § 5.